apertium-en-it.it.dix
    <pardef n="ascri/vere__vblex">
      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>veremmo</l>
	  <r>vere<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>verei</l>
	  <r>vere<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>vereste</l>
	  <r>vere<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>veresti</l>
	  <r>vere<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>verebber</l>
	  <r>vere<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>verebbero</l>
	  <r>vere<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>verebbe</l>
	  <r>vere<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>veremo</l>
	  <r>vere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>verò</l>
	  <r>vere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>verete</l>
	  <r>vere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>verai</l>
	  <r>vere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>veran</l>
	  <r>vere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>veranno</l>
	  <r>vere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>verà</l>
	  <r>vere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>vendo</l>
	  <r>vere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>vendo</l>
	  <r>vere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r>
	</p><par n="S__cantando"/>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>vemmo</l>
	  <r>vere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ssi</l>
	  <r>vere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>veste</l>
	  <r>vere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>vesti</l>
	  <r>vere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>sser</l>
	  <r>vere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ssero</l>
	  <r>vere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>sse</l>
	  <r>vere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>viamo</l>
	  <r>vere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>vete</l>
	  <r>vere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>vi</l>
	  <r>vere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>van</l>
	  <r>vere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>vano</l>
	  <r>vere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>va</l>
	  <r>vere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>ver</l>
	  <r>vere<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>vere</l>
	  <r>vere<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ver</l>
	  <r>vere<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r>
	</p><par n="S__cantar"/>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>vevamo</l>
	  <r>vere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>vevo</l>
	  <r>vere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>vevate</l>
	  <r>vere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>vevi</l>
	  <r>vere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>vevan</l>
	  <r>vere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>vevano</l>
	  <r>vere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>veva</l>
	  <r>vere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>vessimo</l>
	  <r>vere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>vessi</l>
	  <r>vere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>veste</l>
	  <r>vere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>vessi</l>
	  <r>vere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>vesser</l>
	  <r>vere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>vessero</l>
	  <r>vere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>vesse</l>
	  <r>vere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>tte</l>
	  <r>vere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>tta</l>
	  <r>vere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>tti</l>
	  <r>vere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>tto</l>
	  <r>vere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>viamo</l>
	  <r>vere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>vo</l>
	  <r>vere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>vete</l>
	  <r>vere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>vi</l>
	  <r>vere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>von</l>
	  <r>vere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>vono</l>
	  <r>vere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ve</l>
	  <r>vere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>viamo</l>
	  <r>vere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>va</l>
	  <r>vere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>viate</l>
	  <r>vere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>va</l>
	  <r>vere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>van</l>
	  <r>vere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>vano</l>
	  <r>vere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>va</l>
	  <r>vere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

    </pardef>

    <e lm="descrivere"><i>descri</i><par n="ascri/vere__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="circoscrivere"><i>circoscri</i><par n="ascri/vere__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="inscrivere"><i>inscri</i><par n="ascri/vere__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="scrivere"><i>scri</i><par n="ascri/vere__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="prescrivere"><i>prescri</i><par n="ascri/vere__vblex"/></e>
